hu: Kompatibilis rúdméretek: 4 hüvelyk x 4 hüvelyk; 5 hüvelyk x 5 hüvelyk; 6 hüvelyk x 6 hüvelyk; 6 hüvelyk x 8 hüvelyk; Univerzális; Egyéb
lt-LT: Suderinami stulpo matmenys: 4 x 4 col.; 5 x 5 col.; 6 x 6 col.; 6 x 8 col.; Universalus; Kita
ja: 互換性のあるポールディメンション: 4 インチ x 4 インチ; 5 インチ x 5 インチ; 6 インチ x 6 インチ; 6 インチ x 8 インチ; ユニバーサル; その他
ru: Совместимые размеры стойки: 4 x 4 дюйма; 5 x 5 дюймов; 6 x 6 дюймов; 6 x 8 дюймов; Универсальные; Другое
en: Compatible pole dimensions: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Universal; Other
sk-SK: Kompatibilné rozmery tyče: 4 x 4 palce; 5 x 5 palcov; 6 x 6 palcov; 6 x 8 palcov; Univerzálne; Iné
nb: Kompatible poldimensjoner: 4 x 4 tommer; 5 x 5 tommer; 6 x 6 tommer; 6 x 8 tommer; Universell; Annet
fr: Dimensions de poteau compatibles: 4 po x 4 po; 5 po x 5 po; 6 po x 6 po; 6 po x 8 po; Universel; Autre
sl-SI: Združljive dimenzije drogov: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Univerzalno; Drugo
da: Kompatible stangdimensioner: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Universel; Andet
fi: Yhteensopivat pylvään mitat: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Yleinen; Muu
el: Συμβατές διαστάσεις στύλου: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
de: Kompatible Mastabmessungen: 4 x 4 Zoll; 5 x 5 Zoll; 6 x 6 Zoll; 6 x 8 Zoll; Universal; Sonstige
pt-PT: Dimensões do poste compatível: 4 pol. x 4 pol.; 5 pol. x 5 pol.; 6 pol. x 6 pol.; 6 pol. x 8 pol.; Universal; Outro
tr: Uyumlu direk boyutları: 4 inç x 4 inç; 5 inç x 5 inç; 6 inç x 6 inç; 6 inç x 8 inç; Evrensel; Diğer
nl: Compatibele paal afmetingen: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Universeel; Overig
es: Dimensiones del poste compatible: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Universal; Otro
hr-HR: Kompatibilne dimenzije polova: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Univerzalno; Ostalo
ko: 호환 폴 크기: 4 x 4인치; 5 x 5인치; 6 x 6인치; 6 x 8인치; 범용; 기타
ro-RO: Dimensiuni compatibile ale stâlpului: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Universal; Altele
pt-BR: Dimensões de poste/mastro compatíveis: 4 x 4 pol; 5 x 5 pol; 6 x 6 pol; 6 x 8 pol; Universal; Outro
zh-TW: 相容桿件尺寸: 4 吋 x 4 吋; 5 吋 x 5 吋; 6 吋 x 6 吋; 6 吋 x 8 吋; 通用; 其他
zh-CN: 适配立柱尺寸: 4 英寸 x 4 英寸; 5 英寸 x 5 英寸; 6 英寸 x 6 英寸; 6 英寸 x 8 英寸; 通用; 其他
it: Dimensioni del palo compatibile: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Universale; Altro
sv: Kompatibla stolpdimensioner: 4 x 4 tum; 5 x 5 tum; 6 x 6 tum; 6 x 8 tum; Universell; Övrigt
bg-BG: Съвместими размери на стълб: 4 инча x 4 инча; 5 инча x 5 инча; 6 инча x 6 инча; 6 инча x 8 инча; Универсални; Друго
cs: Kompatibilní rozměry pólů: 4 x 4 palce; 5 x 5 palců; 6 x 6 palců; 6 x 8 palců; Univerzální; Jiné
vi: Kích thước cột tương thích: 4 in x 4 in; 5 in x 5 in; 6 in x 6 in; 6 in x 8 in; Phổ thông; Khác
th: เสาที่รองรับข้อมูล: 4 x 4 นิ้ว; 5 x 5 นิ้ว; 6 x 6 นิ้ว; 6 x 8 นิ้ว; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
pl: Kompatybilne wymiary słupka: 4 x 4 cale; 5 x 5 cali; 6 x 6 cali; 6 x 8 cali; Uniwersalne; Inne